en: Lukanka Panagyurska
bg: Луканка Панагюрска, Lukanka Panagyurska

en: Pastarma Govezhda
bg: Пастърма говежда, Pastarma Govezhda

en: Kayserovan vrat Trakiya
bg: Кайсерован врат Тракия, Kayserovan vrat Trakiya

en: Role Trapezitsa
bg: Роле Трапезица, Role Trapezitsa

en: File Elena
bg: Филе Елена, File Elena

en: Gornooryahovski sudzhuk
bg: Горнооряховски суджук, Gornooryahovski sudzhuk

en: Troyanska lukanka, Lukanka Troyanska
bg: Троянска луканка, Луканка Троянска

en: Finnish meat products
fr: Produits carnés finnois
hr: Finski mesni proizvodi
lt: Suomiški mėsos produktai
pl: Fińskie produkty mięsne

en: German meat products
de: Deutsche Fleischprodukte
fr: Produits carnés allemands
hr: Njemački mesni proizvodi
lt: Vokiški mėsos produktai
pl: Niemieckie produkty mięsne

de: Bratwürste, Bratwurst
xx: Bratwurst
en: Bratwursts, Bratwurst sausages
da: Bratwurster, Bratwurstpølser
sv: Bratvurstar, Bratwurstar

en: Thuringian sausages
xx: Thüringer Rostbratwurst
de: Thüringer Rostbratwurst, Original Thüringer Rostbratwürste, Original Thüringer Rostbratwurst
fr: Thüringer
hr: Tiringijske kobasice
nl: Worst uit Thüringen

fr: Saucisses de Nuremberg, Nürnberger Rostbratwürstchen, Nürnberger Bratwürste, petites saucisses de Nuremberg
bg: Нюрнбергски наденички
de: Nürnberger Bratwürste, Nürnberger Rostbratwürste, Original Nürnberger Rostbratwürste, Original Nürnberger Rostbratwurst

de: Münchner Weißwurst
fr: Saucisse blanche de Munich

en: Hungarian meat products
hr: Mađarski mesni proizvodi
lt: Vengriški mėsos produktai
pl: Węgierskie produkty mięsne

en: debrecener
de: Debrecziner, Debreciner, Debreziner, Debriziner
hu: Debrecini virsli

en: Hurka
hu: Hurka

en: Italian meat products
de: Italienische Fleischprodukte
es: Productos cárnicos italianos
fi: Italialaiset lihatuotteet
fr: Produits carnés italiens
hr: Talijanski mesni proizvodi
it: Prodotti a base di carne italiani
lt: Itališki mėsos produktai
nl: Italiaanse vleesproducten
pl: Włoskie produkty mięsne

it: Bresaola della Valtellina
bg: Брезаола дела Валтелина

en: Hams of San Daniele
fr: Jambons de San Daniele, jambon de san daniele
hr: Šunke San Daniele
it: Prosciutto di San Daniele
nl: Ham uit San Daniele

en: Parma ham, Dry-cured Parma ham
fr: Jambons de Parme, jambon de parme, Jambon sec de Parme
hr: Parma šunka
it: Prosciutto di Parma
nl: Parmahammen
pl: Szynka parmeńska